Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4605
Standards; compliance prior to sale, offer for sale, or lease.

Except as provided in section 71-4606, no dealer shall sell, offer for sale, or lease in this state any new or used manufactured home or recreational vehicle manufactured more than four months after May 27, 1975, unless such manufactured home or recreational vehicle meets or exceeds the standards with respect to body and frame design and construction and plumbing, heating, and electrical systems established under the Uniform Standard Code for Manufactured Homes and Recreational Vehicles.

Laws 1969, c. 557, § 5, p. 2273;

Laws 1971, LB 654, § 2;

Laws 1975, LB 300, § 6;

Laws 1985, LB 313, § 10.